North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 17A. Informing Jury in Case Involving Death Penalty.

§ 15-176.3.
Informing and questioning potential jurors on consequences of guilty verdict.

When a jury is being selected for a case in which the defendant is indicted for a crime for which the penalty is a sentence of death, the court, the defense, or the State may inform any person called to serve as a potential juror that the death penalty will be imposed upon the return of a verdict of guilty of that crime and may inquire of any person called to serve as a potential juror whether that person understands the consequences of a verdict of guilty of that crime.

History.

1973, c. 1286, s. 12.

§ 15-176.4.
Instruction to jury on consequences of guilty verdict.

When a defendant is indicted for a crime for which the penalty is a sentence of death, the court, upon request by either party, shall instruct the jury that the death penalty will be imposed upon the return of a verdict of guilty of that crime.

History.

1973, c. 1286, s. 12.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1976 case law on criminal procedure, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 989 (1977).

§ 15-176.5.
Argument to jury on consequences of guilty verdict.

When a case will be submitted to a jury on a charge for which the penalty is a sentence of death, either party in its argument to the jury may indicate the consequences of a verdict of guilty of that charge.

History.

1973, c. 1286, s. 12.

§§ 15-176.6 through 15-176.8.

Reserved for future codification purposes.